Utah statutes.
4-37-601.   Enforcement and penalties.

(1)  Any violation of this chapter is a class B misdemeanor and may be grounds for revocation of the certificate of registration or denial of any future certificate of registration as determined by the department.

(2)  A violation of any rule made under this chapter may be grounds for revocation of the certificate of registration or denial for future certificates of registration as determined by the department.

